District of Columbia statutes.
47-2707

Prosecutions.

All prosecutions under this subchapter shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia upon information by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or 1 of his assistants. Any person violating any of the provisions of this subchapter shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than $10 and not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment of not more than 60 days or both, in the discretion of the court. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

History

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 7
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 465, 32 DCR 4450
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(k), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(p), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2707.
1973 Ed., § 47-2207.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “and not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “nor more than $200”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(p) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.